Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-153
Proceedings; interpreter provided; when.

(1) For any proceeding before an appointing authority including any court at which a deaf or hard of hearing person is subpoenaed or requested in writing to attend, the appointing authority shall obtain a licensed interpreter to interpret the proceedings to the deaf or hard of hearing person and to interpret his or her testimony or statements.

(2) Whenever any state agency uses the services of a qualified interpreter, as defined in federal law, to comply with sections 42 U.S.C. 12102, 12131, and 12132, and any regulations adopted thereunder, as such sections and regulations existed on July 20, 2002, the state agency shall obtain a licensed interpreter to act as a qualified interpreter for such purposes.

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 4.